en: Loose powders, Loose face powders
fr: Poudres libres

en: Setting powders
de: Fixierpuder
es: Polvos fijadores
fr: Poudres fixantes

en: Makeup primers, Face primers
fr: Primer

en: Blush, Blusher, Rouge
fr: Blush, Fards à joues, Fard à joues

en: BB Creams, BB Cream, Blemish Balm Creams
fr: BB Crèmes, BB Crème, BB Cream, BB Creams

en: CC Creams, CC Cream, Color Control Creams
fr: CC Crèmes, CC Crème, CC Creams, CC Cream

en: DD Creams, DD Cream, Daily Defense Creams, Daily Defense Cream
fr: DD Crèmes, DD Crème, DD Creams, DD Cream

en: Nail products, Nail care, Nails
cs: Péče o nehty
da: Negleprodukter, Neglepleje
de: Nagelpflege
es: Cuidado de uñas
fr: Soin des ongles
it: Cura delle unghie
ja: ネイルケア
nb: Neglepleie
nl: Nagelverzorging
pl: Pielęgnacja paznokci
pt: Cuidados com as unhas
ru: Средства для ухода за ногтями
sv: Nagelprodukter, Nagelvård
tr: Tırnak Bakımı

en: Nail makeup
de: Nagel-Make-up, Nagel-Makeup
es: Maquillaje para uñas
fr: Maquillage pour les ongles
it: Trucco per unghie
nl: Nagelmake-up
pt: Maquiagem para unhas

en: Nail polishes, Nail polish
ar: طلاء الأظافر
az: Dırnaq lakı
bg: Лак за нокти
cs: Laky na nehty, Lak na nehty
da: Neglelak
de: Nagellacke, Nagellack
el: Βερνίκι νυχιών
es: Esmaltes de uñas, Esmalte de uñas
et: Küünelakk
fa: لاک ناخن
fi: Kynsilakka
fr: Vernis à ongles
ga: Snas ingne
hr: Lak za nokte
hu: Körömlakk
hy: Եղունգների լաք
id: Cat kuku
is: Naglalakk
it: Smalti per unghie, Smalto per unghie
ja: マニキュア
ka: ფრჩხილის ლაქი
kk: Тырнақ лагы
ko: 매니큐어
ky: Тырмак боёгу
lt: Nagų lakas
lv: Nagu laka
mk: Лак за нокти
ms: Pengilat kuku
mt: Verniċ tad-dwiefer
nb: Neglelakk
nl: Nagellakken, Nagellak
pl: Lakiery do paznokci, Lakier do paznokci
pt: Esmaltes, Verniz para unhas
ro: Lac de unghii
ru: Лаки для ногтей, Лак для ногтей
sk: Lak na nechty
sl: Lak za nohte
sq: Llaku i thonjve
sr: Лак за нокте
sv: Nagellack
sw: Rangi ya kucha
tg: Лаки нохун
th: น้ำยาทาเล็บ
tk: Dyrnak üçin lak
tr: Ojeler, Oje
uk: Лак для нігтів
uz: Tirnoq uchun lak
vi: Sơn móng tay
zh: 指甲油

en: Top Coat
fr: Top Coat
nl: Top Coat

en: Nail hardener
ar: مقوي الأظافر
az: Dırnaq bərkidici
bg: Заздравител за нокти
bn: নখের শক্তিবর্ধক
ca: Enduridor d'ungles
cs: Zpevňovač nehtů
da: Negleforstærker
de: Nagelhärter
el: Σκληρυντικό νυχιών
es: Endurecedor de uñas
et: Küünetugevdaja
fa: سفت کننده ناخن
fi: Kynnenkovettaja
fr: Durcisseur pour les ongles, Durcisseur pour ongles
ga: Cruaiteoir ingne
he: מחזק ציפורניים
hr: Učvršćivač za nokte
hu: Körömerősítő
hy: Եղունգների ամրացուցիչ
id: Pengeras kuku
is: Naglahertir
it: Indurente per unghie
ja: 爪硬化剤
ka: ფრჩხილის გამაგრებელი
kk: Тирнақ қаттылатқышы
km: ឧបករណ៍​ធ្វើ​ក្រចក​ឲ្យ​រឹងមាំ
ko: 손톱 강화제
ky: Тырмак катыргыч
lt: Nagų stipriklis
lv: Nagu stiprinātājs
mk: Зацврстувач за нокти
ms: Pengeras kuku
mt: Iebes tad-dwiefer
nl: Nagelverharder
no: Negleforsterker
pl: Utwardzacz do paznokci
pt: Endurecedor de unhas
ro: Întăritor de unghii
ru: Укрепитель для ногтей
sk: Spevňovač nechtov
sl: Utrjevalec za nohte
sq: Fortësues thonjsh
sr: Учвршћивач за нокте
sv: Nagelhärdare
sw: Ngumu ya kucha
tg: Сахткунандаи нохун
th: น้ำยาเคลือบแข็งเล็บ
tk: Dyrnak gatyldyjysy
tr: Tırnak sertleştirici
uk: Зміцнювач для нігтів
ur: ناخن سخت کرنے والا
uz: Tirnoq qotirgich
vi: Chất làm cứng móng
zh: 指甲硬化剂

en: Nail patch, nail stickers
fr: Nail patch, Stickers pour les ongles

en: Cuticle creams & oils, Cuticle Cream & Oil
cs: Krémy a oleje na nehtovou kůžičku
da: Creme og olie til neglebånd
de: Nagelhautcremes & -Lotionen
es: Aceites y cremas para cutículas
fr: Crèmes et huiles pour cuticules
it: Oli e creme per cuticole
ja: キューティクルオイル・クリーム
nb: Neglekrem og negleolje
nl: Nagelriemcrème en -olie
pl: Kremy i olejki do skórek
pt: Cremes e óleos para cutículas
ru: Кремы и масла для кутикулы
sv: Nagelbandskräm och olja
tr: Kütikül Krem ve Yağı

en: False nails
cs: Umělé nehty
da: Falske negle
de: Künstliche Nägel
es: Uñas postizas
fr: Faux-ongles
it: Unghie finte
ja: ネイルチップ
nb: Falske negler
nl: Valse nagels
pl: Tipsy
pt: Unhas postiças
ru: Накладные ногти
sv: Lösnaglar
tr: Takma Tırnaklar

en: Manicure glues, Manicure glue
cs: Lepidla na nehty
da: Neglelim
de: Nagelkleber
es: Pegamento para uñas
fr: Colle pour faux ongles
it: Colla per unghie
ja: ネイル用接着剤
nb: Neglelim
nl: Nagellijm
pl: Kleje do tipsów
pt: Cola para unhas
ru: Клеи для ногтей
sv: Nagellim
tr: Tırnak Yapıştırıcısı

en: Nail art kits & accessories
cs: Sady a příslušenství pro modeláž nehtů
da: Nail Art Kit og tilbehør
de: Nagelkunst-Zubehör
es: Kits y accesorios de decoración de uñas
fr: Kits et accessoires pour la décoration d'ongles
it: Kit artistici per unghie e accessori
ja: ネイルアートキット・関連用品
nb: Sett og tilbehør for negledesign
nl: Nagelversieringssets en -accessoires
pl: Ozdoby do paznokci
pt: Kits e acessórios de Nail Art
ru: Наборы и принадлежности для нейл-арта
sv: Nagelkonstkit och tillbehör
tr: Tırnak Süsleme Set ve Aksesuarları

en: Nail polish drying drops & sprays
cs: Urychlovače schnutí laku na nehty
da: Spray og dråber til tørring af neglelak
de: Nagellack-Überlacke und -Trockensprays
es: Aerosoles y gotas de secado para esmaltes de uñas
fr: Accélérateurs de séchage
it: Spray e gocce asciugasmalto
ja: マニキュア速乾剤・速乾スプレー
nb: Spray og dråper til tørking av neglelakk
nl: Droogdruppels en -sprays voor nagellak
pl: Krople i spraye przyspieszające schnięcie lakieru do paznokci
pt: Gotas e sprays secantes para as unhas
ru: Капли и спреи для сушки лака для ногтей
sv: Torkdroppar och torkspray till nagellack
tr: Oje Kurutma Damlaları ve Spreyleri

en: Nail polish thinners
cs: Ředidla laků na nehty
da: Fortyndere til neglelak
de: Nagellackverdünner
es: Disolventes para esmaltes de uñas
fr: Diluants à vernis
it: Solventi per unghie
ja: マニキュアうすめ液
nb: Neglelakktynner
nl: Nagellakverdunners
pl: Rozcieńczalniki lakieru do paznokci
pt: Diluente para esmalte
ru: Разбавители для лака для ногтей
sv: Förtunningsmedel för nagellack
tr: Oje İncelticiler

en: Lip Makeup
ar: مكياج الشفاه
az: Dodaq makiyajı
bg: Грим за устни
cs: Líčení rtů
da: Læbemakeup
de: Lippen-Make-up
el: Μακιγιάζ χειλιών
es: Maquillaje labial
et: Huulemeik
fa: آرایش لب
fi: Huulimeikki
fr: Maquillage pour les lèvres
ga: Smideadh liopaí
hr: Šminka za usne
hu: Ajaksmink
hy: Շրթունքների դիմահարդարում
id: Rias bibir
is: Varalita förðun
it: Trucco labbra
ja: リップメイク
ka: ტუჩის მაკიაჟი
kk: Ерін макияжы
ko: 립 메이크업
ky: Эрин макияжы
lt: Lūpų makiažas
lv: Lūpu grims
mk: Шминка за усни
ms: Solek bibir
mt: Mejkapp tax-xufftejn
nl: Lippenmake-up
no: Leppesminke
pl: Makijaż ust
pt: Maquilhagem labial
ro: Machiaj pentru buze
ru: Макияж губ
sk: Líčenie pier
sl: Ličenje ustnic
sq: Grim për buzë
sr: Шминка за усне
sv: Läppsmink
sw: Vipodozi vya midomo
tg: Ороиши лаб
th: แต่งหน้าริมฝีปาก
tk: Dodak makýažy
tr: Dudak makyajı
uk: Макіяж для губ
uz: Lablar uchun makiyaj
vi: Trang điểm môi
zh: 唇妆